Massachusetts, session 194th, H3915.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Leo MacAskill, 
a retired police officer of the Revere police department and a member of the Revere retirement 
system, may reapply for retirement benefits pursuant to section 7 of chapter 32 of the General 
Laws. If the Revere retirement board determines pursuant to said section 7 of said chapter 32, as 
amended by chapter 149 of the acts of 2024, that Leo MacAskill was retired for a violent act 
injury, all of his retirement benefits dispensed after such determination shall be paid and 
administered in accordance with retirement for a violent act injury pursuant to said section 7 of 
said chapter 32, as so amended. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.